Virginia statutes. Title 25.1. Eminent Domain.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 25.1-200.
Chapter controls condemnation proceedings.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by law, all proceedings for the condemnation of property under the power of eminent domain shall be brought and conducted according to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1962, c. 426, § 25-46.2; 2003, c. 940.

Cross references.

As to constitutional limitation on eminent domain, see Va. Const., Art. I, § 11.

As to limitations on eminent domain, see §

1-219.1

.

As to the power of the Virginia Small Business Financing Authority to condemn property in furtherance of its purposes, see §

2.2-2286

.

As to power of eminent domain by: Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority, see §

5.1-160

; Department of Conservation and Recreation, see § 10.1-201; localities, see §

15.2-1901.1

et seq.; corporation against corporation, see §

25.1-102

; Commissioner of Highways, see §

33.2-1000

et seq.; housing authorities, see §

36-27

; public service corporations generally, see § 56-49; railroads, see § 56-347; telegraph and telephone companies, see § 56-464; other utility companies, § 56-260.

As to the notice required when Commissioner of Highways exercises the power of eminent domain, see §

33.2-1013

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1962, c. 426, cl. 4, which enacted former §§ 25-46.1 et seq., provided that “nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to repeal, amend, impair or affect any provision of any charter of any city or town.”

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 6 Pleading. § 6.02 Complaints. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.22 Condemnation and Eminent Domain. Friend.

Nichols on Eminent Domain (Matthew Bender).

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-401 Petition for Condemnation of Permanent and Temporary Rights of Entry; No. 6-401.1 Petition for Condemnation — Another Form; No. 6-404 Petition for Condemnation by County for Roadway; No. 6-410 Affidavit for Notice by Publication.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

17 M.J. Streets and Highways, §§ 6, 8, 23.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Inverse condemnation denied. —

Property owner’s petition, seeking an order requiring an earlier condemnation of the owner’s property, was rejected where the city housing authority was acting within an approved resolution, under which the owner’s property would be acquired within five years; otherwise, the orderly administration of the project could be thwarted by owners within the project area forcing condemnation proceedings on a timeline different from that contemplated by the project. BWT, L.L.C. v. Norfolk Redevelopment & Hous. Auth., 57 Va. Cir. 121, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 424 (Norfolk Nov. 6, 2001) (decided under prior law).

§ 25.1-201.
Jurisdiction of condemnation proceedings.

Jurisdiction of proceedings to condemn property under this chapter shall be in the circuit court of the county or city wherein such property, or the greater portion thereof proposed to be condemned is situated, unless otherwise specifically provided by law.

History.

Code 1919, § 4361; Code 1950, § 25-2; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.4; 2003, c. 940.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 16 Miscellaneous Proceedings. § 16.03 Eminent Domain Condemnations. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.22 Condemnation and Eminent Domain. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 65, 72.

§ 25.1-202.
Nature of proceedings.

Condemnation proceedings shall be conducted as actions at law.

History.

1972, c. 533, § 25-46.4:1; 2003, c. 940.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 16 Miscellaneous Proceedings. § 16.03 Eminent Domain Condemnations. Bryson.

§ 25.1-203.
Authority of certain condemnors to inspect property; reimbursement for damages; notice prior to entry.

In connection with any project wherein the power of eminent domain may be exercised, any locality or any petitioner exercising the procedure set forth in Chapter 3 (§

25.1-300

et seq.), acting through its duly authorized officers, agents or employees, may enter upon any property without the written permission of its owner if the petitioner has requested the owner’s permission to inspect the property as provided in subsection B.

A request for permission to inspect shall (i) be on the petitioner’s official letterhead and signed by an authorized officer, agent, or employee of such entity; (ii) be sent to the owner by certified mail, return receipt requested, delivered by guaranteed overnight courier, or otherwise delivered to the owner in person with proof of delivery; (iii) be made not less than 30 days prior to the first date of the proposed inspection; and (iv) notify the owner that if permission is withheld, the petitioner shall be permitted to enter the property on the date of the proposed inspection. A mere citation of this section number of the Code of Virginia shall not satisfy the requirements of clause (iv). A request for permission to inspect shall be deemed to be made on the date of mailing, if mailed, or otherwise on the date of delivery.
B. 1. A request for permission to inspect shall (i) be on the petitioner’s official letterhead and signed by an authorized officer, agent, or employee of such entity; (ii) be sent to the owner by certified mail, return receipt requested, delivered by guaranteed overnight courier, or otherwise delivered to the owner in person with proof of delivery; (iii) be made not less than 30 days prior to the first date of the proposed inspection; and (iv) notify the owner that if permission is withheld, the petitioner shall be permitted to enter the property on the date of the proposed inspection. A mere citation of this section number of the Code of Virginia shall not satisfy the requirements of clause (iv). A request for permission to inspect shall be deemed to be made on the date of mailing, if mailed, or otherwise on the date of delivery.

A request for permission to inspect shall include (i) the specific date or dates such inspection is proposed to be made; (ii) the name of the entity entering the property; (iii) the number of persons for whom permission is sought; (iv) the purpose for which entry is made; and (v) the testing, appraisals, or examinations to be performed and other actions to be taken.

If a request for permission is provided in accordance with subdivision 1, a petitioner may enter the property sooner than the 30 days indicated in the request only if the owner provides permission, in writing, to enter on an earlier date.

Any entry authorized by this section (i) shall be for the purpose of making surveys, tests, appraisals or examinations thereof in order to determine the suitability of such property for the project, and (ii) shall not be deemed a trespass.

The petitioner shall make reimbursement for any actual damages resulting from entry upon the property. In any action filed under this section, the court may award the owner his reasonable (i) attorney fees, (ii) court costs, and (iii) fees for up to three experts or as many experts as are called by the petitioner, whichever is greater, who testified at trial if the court finds that the petitioner damaged the owner’s property. A proceeding under this subsection shall not preclude the owner from pursuing any additional remedies available at law or equity.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to the practice of land surveying, as defined in §

54.1-400

, when such surveying is not involved in any eminent domain or any proposed eminent domain matter.

History.

1968, c. 415, § 25-232.1; 1970, c. 182; 2003, c. 940; 2005, c. 877; 2019, c. 788; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 60.

Cross references.

As to condemnation of land for school purposes, see § 22.1-127.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 788, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed, prior to July 1, 2019, (i) a petition in condemnation pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 of the Code of Virginia or (ii) a certificate of take or deposit pursuant to Title 33.2 or Chapter 3 (§

25.1-300

et seq.) of Title 25.1 of the Code of Virginia. Any condemnation proceedings in which the petitioner filed a petition or certificate described in clause (i) or (ii) on or after July 1, 2005, and prior to July 1, 2019, shall be governed by the provisions of the Code of Virginia in effect prior to July 1, 2019.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 877 redesignated former subsection B as subdivision B 1 and rewrote subdivision B 1; added subdivision B 2 and subsection F; inserted “tests” in clause (i) in subsection D; and rewrote subsections C and E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 788, in subdivision B 2, inserted clause (iii) and redesignated former clauses (iii) and (iv) as (iv) and (v), respectively; in subsection C, inserted the first and fourth sentences; rewrote subsection E, which read: “The petitioner shall make reimbursement for any actual damages resulting from entry upon the property. In any action filed under this section, the court may award the owner his reasonable (i) attorneys’ fees, (ii) court costs, and (iii) fees for no more than three expert witnesses testifying at trial if: (a) the court finds that the petitioner maliciously, willfully, or recklessly damaged the owner’s property; or (b) the court awards the owner actual damages in an amount 30 percent or more greater than the petitioner’s final written offer made no later than 30 days after the filing of an answer in circuit court or the return date in general district court. A proceeding under this subsection shall not preclude the owner from pursuing any additional remedies available at law or equity”; and made stylistic changes. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 60, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, deleted clauses (ii) and (iii), which read “(ii) the owner’s written permission is not received prior to the date entry is proposed, and (iii) the petitioner has given the owner notice of intent to enter as provided in subsection C” and made related changes; in subdivision B 1, inserted clauses (i) and (iv) and redesignated former clauses (i) and (ii) as clauses (ii) and (iii), and in clause (iii), substituted “30 days prior” for “15 days prior” in the first sentence, and inserted the second sentence; added subdivision B 3; and deleted former subsection C, relating to the notice of intent to enter; and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly.

Law Review.

For article reviewing recent developments and changes in legislation, case law, and Virginia Supreme Court Rules affecting civil litigation, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 95 (2005).

For student note, “This Land is Your Land? Survey Delegation Laws as a Compensable Taking,” see 25 Wash. & Lee J. Civil Rts. & Soc. Just. 545 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Counties, § 36.

§ 25.1-204.
Effort to purchase required; prerequisite to effort to purchase or filing certificate.

A condemnor shall not institute proceedings to condemn property until a bona fide but ineffectual effort to purchase from the owner the property sought to be condemned has been made. However, such effort shall not be required if the consent cannot be obtained because one or more of the owners (i) is a person under a disability or is otherwise unable to convey legal title to such property, (ii) is unknown, or (iii) cannot with reasonable diligence be found within this Commonwealth.

Such bona fide effort shall include delivery of, or attempt to deliver, a written offer to acquire accompanied by a written statement to the owner that explains the factual basis for the condemnor’s offer. The written statement shall include a description of the public use for which it is necessary to acquire the owner’s property and shall contain a certification that the acquisition has been reviewed by the condemnor for purposes of complying with §

1-219.1

. The written offer shall be made upon the state agency’s letterhead and shall be signed by an authorized employee of such state agency.

If the condemnor obtains an appraisal of the property pursuant to the provisions of §

25.1-417

, such written statement shall include a complete copy of the appraisal of the property upon which such offer is based. If the condemnor obtains more than one appraisal, such written statement shall include a copy of all appraisals obtained prior to making an offer to acquire or initiating negotiations for the real property.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a condemnor, prior to making an offer to acquire a fee simple interest in property by purchase or filing a certificate of take or certificate of deposit pursuant to Chapter 3 (§

25.1-300

et seq.) or §

33.2-1019

, shall (i) conduct or cause to be conducted an examination of title to the property in order to ascertain the identity of each owner of such property and to determine the nature and extent of such owner’s interests in the property, which examination of title shall be for at least 60 years; (ii) provide to such owner or owners a copy of the report showing the examination of title; and (iii) provide to such owner or owners a copy of all recorded instruments within the 60-year title history of such property, including all deeds of trust, releases, liens, deeds, or other instruments identified in the report.

A state agency’s acquisition of real property in connection with any programs or projects pursuant to this title or Title 33.2 shall be conducted in accordance with the following provisions:

Before making an offer to acquire or initiating any related negotiations for real property, the state agency shall establish an amount which it believes to be just compensation therefor and shall make a prompt offer to acquire the property for the full amount so established. In no event shall such amount be less than the state agency’s approved appraisal of the fair market value of such property, if such an appraisal is required, or the current assessed value of such property for real estate tax purposes, unless the property has physically changed in a material and substantial way since the current assessment date such that the real estate tax assessment no longer represents a fair valuation of the property, when the entire parcel for which the assessment is made is to be acquired, whichever is greater. Any decrease or increase in the fair market value of real property prior to the date of valuation caused by the public improvement for which such property is acquired, or by the likelihood that the property would be acquired for such improvement, other than that due to physical deterioration within the reasonable control of the owner, shall be disregarded in determining the compensation for the property. The state agency concerned shall provide the owner of real property to be acquired with a written statement of, and summary of the basis for, the amount it established as just compensation, and, if an appraisal is required or obtained, such written statement and summary shall include a complete copy of all appraisals of the real property to be acquired that the state agency obtained prior to making an offer to acquire or initiating negotiations for the real property. The state agency shall provide its written statement of the amount it established as just compensation on its letterhead, which shall be signed by an authorized employee of such state agency. Where appropriate, the just compensation for the real property acquired and for damages to remaining real property shall be separately stated.

No owner shall be required to surrender possession of real property before the state agency pays the agreed purchase price, or deposits with the state court in accordance with applicable law, for the benefit of the owner, (i) an amount not less than the state agency’s approved appraisal of the fair market value of such property, if such an appraisal is required, or the current assessed value of such property for real estate tax purposes, unless the property has physically changed in a material and substantial way since the current assessment date such that the real estate tax assessment no longer represents a fair valuation of the property, when the entire parcel for which the assessment is made is to be acquired, whichever is greater, or (ii) the amount of the award of compensation in the condemnation proceeding for such property.

Nothing in this section shall make evidence of tax assessments admissible as proof of value in an eminent domain proceeding.

History.

Code 1919, § 4363; Code 1950, § 25-7; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.5; 1998, c. 556; 2000, c. 1029; 2003, cc. 627, 940; 2005, c. 878; 2011, cc. 117, 190; 2013, c. 764; 2020, c. 793; 2022, c. 735.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 627 amended § 25-46.5, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2003, c. 627 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2003 amendments by c. 627, in subsection D, inserted the clause (i) designation, and inserted “and (ii) provide to such owner or owners a copy of the report of status of title” at the end.

Acts 2011, cc. 117 and 190, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to the acquisition of real property by a railroad, public service corporation, municipal corporation, local governmental unit, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or two or more of the aforementioned, that is (i) the subject of a certificate recorded prior to July 1, 2011, in the clerk’s office where deeds are recorded; (ii) the subject of a petition for condemnation filed prior to July 1, 2011; or (iii) required to construct a project funded by bonds approved for issuance by a locality prior to July 1, 2011.”

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

Acts
2022, c. 735, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to the taking of or damage to property that has occurred on or after July 1, 2022, or a condemnation proceeding that has been filed on or after July 1, 2022, as appropriate.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 878 added subsection E.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 117 and 190 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “offer to acquire accompanied by a written” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; added the last sentence in subsection C; and in subdivision E 1, in the first sentence, inserted “making an offer to acquire or” and “any related,” in the second and fourth sentences, inserted “state,” and in the fourth sentence, deleted “together with a copy of the agency’s approved appraisal of the fair market value of such property upon which the agency has based the amount offered for the property, if such an appraisal is required” from the end and added the language beginning “and, if an appraisal is required or obtained”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 764 added “or the current assessed value of such property for real estate tax purposes, unless the property has physically changed in a material and substantial way since the current assessment date such that the real estate tax assessment no longer represents a fair valuation of the property, when the entire parcel for which the assessment is made is to be acquired, whichever is greater” at the end of the second sentence of subdivision E 1 and in clause (i) of subdivision E 2; and added subsection F.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 793, in subsection B, substituted “for which it is necessary to acquire the owner’s property” for “that provides the basis for the condemnor’s acquisition” and added the last sentence; and in subdivision E 1, inserted the penultimate sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 735, in subsection D, substituted “property, which examination of title shall be for at least 60 years” for “property and” in clause (i), substituted “report showing the examination of title; and” for “report of status of title” in clause (ii), and added clause (iii); and made stylistic changes.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 16 Miscellaneous Proceedings. § 16.03 Eminent Domain Condemnations. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.22 Condemnation and Eminent Domain. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-401. Petition for Condemnation of Permanent and Temporary Rights of Entry; No. 6-401.1 Petition for Condemnation — Another Form; No. 6-404 Petition for Condemnation by County for Roadway.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 64; 17 M.J. Streets and Highways, §§ 3, 5, 19.